Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 6
UNINSURED MOTORIST
IDENTIFICATION DATABASE PROGRAM

42-7-601. Short title.

This part 6 shall be known and may be cited as the "Motorist Insurance Identification Database Program Act".

Repealed.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 715, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1447, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) repealed, p. 2649, § 11, effective July 1.

42-7-602. Uninsured motorist identification database program - creation.

The general assembly hereby directs the transportation legislation review committee to conduct an examination of the problem of uninsured motorists in this state and to propose legislation which shall alleviate if not eliminate the problem. The general assembly further directs the transportation legislation review committee to examine Colorado's compulsory motor vehicle insurance system. Such examination shall include a review of whether such system should be maintained or repealed and whether there are more effective enforcement mechanisms that might be employed. The committee shall also study the effectiveness of other enforcement mechanisms including, but not limited to, uninsured motorist database programs that have been employed in other compulsory insurance states.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 715, § 1, effective May 23.

42-7-603. Definitions.

As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Database" means the motorist insurance identification database described in section 42-7-604 (5).

"Department" means the department of revenue.

"Designated agent" means the party with which the department contracts under section 42-7-604.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2000, p. 1649

, § 43, effective June 1, 2000.)

"Program" means the motorist insurance identification database program created in section 42-7-604.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1447, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 1649, § 43, effective June 1.

42-7-604. Motorist insurance identification database program - creation - administration - selection of designated agent - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the purpose of this section is to help reduce the uninsured motorist population in this state and measure the effectiveness of the motorist insurance identification database created herein.

The general assembly further recognizes that the information and data required to be disclosed by insurers in creating and maintaining the motorist insurance identification database is proprietary in nature. Accordingly, the parties handling such information and data shall at all times maintain their confidential and proprietary nature.

The motorist insurance identification database program is hereby created for the purpose of establishing a database to use when verifying compliance with the motor vehicle security requirements in this article and in articles 3 and 4 of this title. The program shall be administered by the department.

The department shall monitor compliance with the financial security requirements of this article and may contract with a designated agent to monitor such compliance with the financial security requirements of this article. If the department contracts with a designated agent, the agent shall be authorized to perform all functions of the department delegated to the agent in the contract.

After a contract has been entered into with a designated agent, the department shall convene a working group for the purpose of facilitating the implementation of the program. The working group shall consist of representatives of the insurance industry, the division of insurance, the department of public safety, and the department.

The department or its designated agent, using its own computer network, shall develop and maintain a computer database with information provided by:

Insurers, pursuant to section

10-4-615

, C.R.S.; except that any person who qualifies as self-insured pursuant to section

10-4-624

, C.R.S., shall not be required to provide information to the department; and

The department shall compare the make, year, and vehicle identification number of all registered vehicles to policy information provided by insurers.

The department shall establish guidelines for the development and maintenance of a database so that the database can easily be accessed by state and local law enforcement agencies.

The department shall:

Provide an internet option that allows insurers and their agents, including commercial insurers, to submit insurance information directly to the designated agent. Each insurer shall cooperate with the verification process.

Provide a reasonable and adequate quality control process to ensure the accurate input of data, including the vehicle identification numbers and insurance information;

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2006, p. 1011

, § 7, effective July 1, 2006.)

Provide each county clerk access to the most currently available data from the database of insurance information.

The department shall, at least weekly:

Update the database with information provided by insurers in accordance with section 10-4-615, C.R.S.;

Compare then-current motor vehicle registrations against the database.

(6.5) and (7) Repealed.

(8) The department, in cooperation with the division of insurance, shall promulgate rules and develop procedures for administering and enforcing this part 6. Such rules shall specify the reporting requirements that are necessary and appropriate for commercial lines of insurance and shall be developed with input by insurers and the designated agent.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1448, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 787, § 4, effective July 1, 1999.

L. 2000:

(3), (4), (5)(a)(II), (5)(b), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1649, § 44, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(7) amended, p. 1034, § 77, effective June 1; (7) amended, p. 872, § 10, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(5)(c) added and (6.5) and (7) repealed, pp. 2649, 2650, §§ 12, 13, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5)(a)(I) amended, p. 907, § 37, effective May 21; (5)(a)(I) and (5)(c)(III) amended, p. 795, § 6, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2006:

(4)(a), (5), IP(6) amended, p. 1011, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (7) by Senate Bill 02-159 and House Bill 02-1341 were harmonized.

42-7-605. Notice of lack of financial responsibility. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1449, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1) and (3) amended, p. 1650, § 45, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

IP(1) amended, p. 523, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

(5) added, p. 1885, § 1, effective May 22; (1)(a) amended, p. 1575, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5) amended, p. 907, § 38, effective May 21; (1) and (5) amended, p. 795, § 7, effective January 1, 2005.

L. 2005:

IP(1)(a) amended, p. 1179, § 22, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 1012, § 8, effective July 1.

42-7-606. Disclosure of insurance information - penalty.

Information provided by insurers and the department for inclusion in the database established pursuant to section 42-7-604 is the property of the insurer or the department, as the case may be, and may not be disclosed except as follows:

The department shall verify a motor vehicle's insurance coverage upon request by any state or local government agency investigating, litigating, or enforcing such motor vehicle's compliance with the financial security requirements.

The department shall disclose whether a motor vehicle has the required insurance coverage upon request by the following individuals and agencies only:

The owner;

The parent or legal guardian of the owner if the owner is an unemancipated minor;

The legal guardian of the owner if the owner is legally incapacitated;

Any person who has power of attorney from the owner;

Any person who submits a notarized release from the owner that is dated no more than ninety days before the date the request is made;

Any person suffering loss or injury in a motor vehicle accident, but only as part of an accident report authorized in part 16 of article 4 of this title; or

The office of the state auditor, for the purpose of conducting any audit authorized by law.

Any person or agency who knowingly discloses information from the database for a purpose or to a person other than those authorized in this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

The state shall not be liable to any person for gathering, managing, or using information in the database pursuant to this part 6.

The designated agent shall not be liable to any person for performing its duties under this part 6, unless and to the extent said agent commits a willful and wanton act or omission. The designated agent shall be liable to any insurer damaged by the designated agent's negligent failure to protect the confidential and proprietary nature of the information and data disclosed by the insurer to the designated agent.

The designated agent shall provide to this state an errors and omissions insurance policy covering said designated agent in an appropriate amount.

No insurer shall be liable to any person for performing its duties under this part 6, unless and to the extent the insurer commits a willful and wanton act or omission.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1450, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1650, § 46, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1564, § 379, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 1014, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 208, § 1, effective August 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-7-607. Part 6 not to supersede other provisions.

This part 6 shall not supersede other actions or penalties that may be taken or imposed for violation of the financial security requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1451, § 6, effective July 1.

42-7-608. Review by department of regulatory agencies - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1451, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 522, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 2646, § 2, effective July 1.

42-7-609. Report.

The department of revenue shall submit a report, in consultation with the division of insurance, regarding the effectiveness of the motorist insurance database, including without limitation the department's recommendations on whether the program should be continued and on whether enforcement mechanisms should be instituted or changed. The report shall be submitted to the house business affairs and labor committee of the general assembly by January 1, 2008.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1451, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 522, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2646, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1011, § 6, effective July 1.